Alabama, session 2026rs, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Hudnell's Law.
Section 2. (a) In any action to modify a prior judgment
awarding custody, the court may grant the modification only if
there has been a material change of circumstances since that
judgment was entered and the court finds by a preponderance of
the evidence that the modification is in the best interest of
the child. In determining whether the modification is in the
best interest of the child, the court shall consider all
relevant factors including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The emotional, mental, physical, and developmental
needs of the child.
(2) The ability of each parent to meet the needs
described in subdivision (1).
(3) The child's relationship with each parent.
(4) The stability of the proposed home environments.
(5) The child's adjustment to home, school, and the
community.
(6) Evidence of parental alienation, domestic or family
violence, or substance abuse.
(7) The child's preference, if the court deems the
child to be of sufficient age and maturity.
(8) The willingness and ability of each parent to
facilitate and encourage a close and continuing relationship
between the child and the other parent.
(9) Each parent's capacity to provide continuity in the
Page 2

(9) Each parent's capacity to provide continuity in the
SB261 INTRODUCED
child's education and medical care.
(10) Each parent's history of compliance with court
orders and facilitation of the child's welfare.
(b) This section shall apply to any prior judgment
awarding custody, including, but not limited to, a judgment
awarding sole, primary, or joint custody.
(c) Nothing in this section may be construed to
authorize or require a heightened burden of standard that
requires parents seeking custody modification to prove that
the benefits of the modification outweigh the disruption of
the child's environment.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3